Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-819.01
Museum Construction and Maintenance Fund; created; use; investment.

The Museum Construction and Maintenance Fund is hereby created. The fund shall consist of transfers at the direction of the Legislature and any gifts, bequests, or other contributions to such fund from public or private entities. The Game and Parks Commission shall administer the fund. The fund shall be used to (1) provide grants to a federally recognized Indian tribe for the purposes of construction of a museum and visitor center honoring Chief Standing Bear, including visitor center development, exhibit fabrication, and historical interpretation, and for any administrative costs related to the grants, and (2) construct, develop, and manage a museum at Fort Robinson State Park. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Investment earnings shall be credited to the fund.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 44;

Laws 2024, LB1413, § 31.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.